Utah statutes.
70A-3-420.   Conversion of instrument.
(1)  The law applicable to conversion of personal property applies to
instruments.  An instrument is also converted if it is taken by transfer,
other than a negotiation, from a person not entitled to enforce the instrument
or a bank makes or obtains payment with respect to the instrument for a person
not entitled to enforce the instrument or receive payment.  An action for
conversion of an instrument may not be brought by the issuer or acceptor of
the instrument, or a payee or indorsee who did not receive delivery of the
instrument either directly or through delivery to an agent or a copayee.
(2)  In an action under Subsection (1), the measure of liability is presumed
to be the amount payable on the instrument, but recovery may not exceed the
amount of the plaintiff's interest in the instrument.
(3)  A representative, other than a depositary bank, who has in good faith
dealt with an instrument or its proceeds on behalf of one who was not the
person entitled to enforce the instrument is not liable in conversion to that
person beyond the amount of any proceeds that it has not paid out.
